Vermont statutes. Title 11C Mutual Benefit Enterprises
Article 7. Marketing Contracts

§ 701.
Authority.

In this article, “marketing contract” means a contract between a mutual benefit enterprise and another person who need not be a patron member:

requiring the other person to sell or to deliver for sale or marketing on the person’s behalf a specified part of the person’s products, commodities, or goods exclusively to or through the enterprise or any facilities furnished by the enterprise; or

authorizing the enterprise to act for the person in any manner with respect to the products, commodities, or goods.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 84

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 20, 2012.

§ 702.
Marketing contracts.

If a marketing contract provides for the sale of products, commodities, or goods to a mutual benefit enterprise, the sale transfers title to the enterprise upon delivery or at any other specific time expressly provided by the contract.

A marketing contract may:

authorize a mutual benefit enterprise to create an enforceable security interest in the products, commodities, or goods delivered; and

allow the enterprise to sell the products, commodities, or goods delivered and pay the sales price on a pooled or other basis after deducting selling costs, processing costs, overhead, expenses, and other charges.

Some or all of the provisions of a marketing contract between a patron member and a mutual benefit enterprise may be contained in the organic rules.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 84

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 20, 2012.

§ 703.
Duration of marketing contract.

The initial duration of a marketing contract may not exceed 10 years, but the contract may be self-renewing for additional periods not exceeding five years each. Unless the contract provides for another manner or time for termination, either party may terminate the contract by giving notice in a record at least 90 days before the end of the current term.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 84

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 20, 2012.

§ 704.
Remedies for breach of contract.

Damages to be paid to a mutual benefit enterprise for breach or anticipatory repudiation of a marketing contract may be liquidated, but only at an amount or under a formula that is reasonable in light of the actual or anticipated harm caused by the breach or repudiation. A provision that so provides is not a penalty.

Upon a breach of a marketing contract, whether by anticipatory repudiation or otherwise, a mutual benefit enterprise may seek:

an injunction to prevent further breach; and

specific performance.

The remedies in this section are in addition to any other remedies available to an enterprise under law other than this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 84

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 20, 2012.